Tennessee, session 114, HB1786.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 69, Chapter 9, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The operator of a recreational vessel shall not:
(1) Moor the vessel for more than fourteen (14) consecutive days at any
one (1) place along the water's edge of a reservoir or at any place within one (1)
mile of the water's edge;
(2) Establish temporary moorage within the limits of primary or secondary
navigation channels of the Tennessee River system; or
(3) Place the mooring lines of the vessel in such a way as to block or
hinder boating access to any part of a reservoir.
(b) A violation of subdivision (a)(1), (a)(2), or (a)(3) is a Class C misdemeanor.
(c) It is not a violation of subdivision (a)(1) if the recreational vessel has been
issued a permit for permanent or extended mooring pursuant to federal law.
(d) As used in this section:
(1) "Moor" means the act of making fast or securing a recreational vessel
with lines or anchors;
(2) "Recreational vessel" means a vessel manufactured or used primarily
for noncommercial use or leased, rented, or chartered to another for the latter's
noncommercial use;
HB1786
009305
- 1 -

(3) "Reservoir" means a basin that contains or will contain the water
impounded by a dam and that is under the management and control of a federal
agency; and
(4) "Tennessee River system" means any part of the Tennessee River or
any of the Tennessee River's tributaries that are under the management and
control of a federal agency.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009305